Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB462.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 402 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A clerk of the county where a marriage license was issued or recorded, upon receipt of an affidavit executed
by both parties to the marriage, may correct a marriage application or marriage license that contains errors
or omitted information. The corrections may include but are not limited to:
(a) Misspelling of a participant's name or address;
(b) Misspelling of the name of a parent or witness;
(c) Omitted witness, county of marriage, or officiant information; or
(d) Incorrect:
1. Occupational information;
2. Marriage date;
3. Location of birth; or
4. Parent information.
(2) Nothing in this section shall preclude the parties from obtaining a corrected marriage license by an order of
the court pertaining to any of the information in subsection (1) of this section or as may be otherwise
required by law.
(3) Any person who intentionally makes a material false statement in the affidavit shall be subject to the
penalties prescribed in KRS 523.030.
Section 2. KRS 209A.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a trust and agency account in the State Treasury to be known as the domestic violence
shelter fund. Each county clerk shall remit to the fund, by the tenth of the month, ten dollars ($10)[ from each
twenty-four dollars ($24)] collected during the previous month from the issuance or amending of marriage
licenses. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Revenue. The Cabinet for Health and Family
Services shall use the funds for the purpose of providing protective shelter services for domestic violence
victims.
(2) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall designate one (1) nonprofit corporation in each area
development district to serve as the primary service provider and regional planning authority for domestic
violence shelter, crisis, and advocacy services in the district in which the designated provider is located.
Signed by Governor March 31, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version